cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.aff
SFX B Y 582
SFX B   ąc        ęknijże   ląc
SFX B   ąc        ęknij     ląc
SFX B   ąc        ęknijmyż  ląc
SFX B   ąc        ęknijmy   ląc
SFX B   ąc        ęknijcież ląc
SFX B   ąc        ęknijcie  ląc
SFX B   c         żże       siąc
SFX B   c         ż         siąc
SFX B   c         żmyż      siąc
SFX B   c         żmy       siąc
SFX B   c         żcież     siąc
SFX B   c         żcie      siąc
SFX B   c         żże       ząc
SFX B   c         ż         ząc
SFX B   c         żmyż      ząc
SFX B   c         żmy       ząc
SFX B   c         żcież     ząc
SFX B   c         żcie      ząc
SFX B   0         zże       [ps]iec
SFX B   0         z         [ps]iec
SFX B   0         zmyż      [ps]iec
SFX B   0         zmy       [ps]iec
SFX B   0         zcież     [ps]iec
SFX B   0         zcie      [ps]iec
SFX B   c         gnijże    biec
SFX B   c         gnij      biec
SFX B   c         gnijmyż   biec
SFX B   c         gnijmy    biec
SFX B   c         gnijcież  biec
SFX B   c         gnijcie   biec
SFX B   c         gnijże    [aiouyz]lec
SFX B   c         gnij      [aiouyz]lec
SFX B   c         gnijmyż   [aiouyz]lec
SFX B   c         gnijmy    [aiouyz]lec
SFX B   c         gnijcież  [aiouyz]lec
SFX B   c         gnijcie   [aiouyz]lec
SFX B   c         knijże    ciec
SFX B   c         knij      ciec
SFX B   c         knijmyż   ciec
SFX B   c         knijmy    ciec
SFX B   c         knijcież  ciec
SFX B   c         knijcie   ciec
SFX B   c         żże       z[ey]c
SFX B   c         ż         z[ey]c
SFX B   c         żmyż      z[ey]c
SFX B   c         żmy       z[ey]c
SFX B   c         żcież     z[ey]c
SFX B   c         żcie      z[ey]c
SFX B   c         żże       móc
SFX B   c         ż         móc
SFX B   c         żmyż      móc
SFX B   c         żmy       móc
SFX B   c         żcież     móc
SFX B   c         żcie      móc
SFX B   0         zże       uc
SFX B   0         z         uc
SFX B   0         zmyż      uc
SFX B   0         zmy       uc
SFX B   0         zcież     uc
SFX B   0         zcie      uc
SFX B   0         zże       [bw]lec
SFX B   0         z         [bw]lec
SFX B   0         zmyż      [bw]lec
SFX B   0         zmy       [bw]lec
SFX B   0         zcież     [bw]lec
SFX B   0         zcie      [bw]lec
SFX B   chać      dźże      chać
SFX B   chać      dź        chać
SFX B   chać      dźmyż     chać
SFX B   chać      dźmy      chać
SFX B   chać      dźcież    chać
SFX B   chać      dźcie     chać
SFX B   gać       żyjże     [^u]gać
SFX B   gać       żyj       [^u]gać
SFX B   gać       żyjmyż    [^u]gać
SFX B   gać       żyjmy     [^u]gać
SFX B   gać       żyjcież   [^u]gać
SFX B   gać       żyjcie    [^u]gać
SFX B   gać       żże       ugać
SFX B   gać       ż         ugać
SFX B   gać       żmyż      ugać
SFX B   gać       żmy       ugać
SFX B   gać       żcież     ugać
SFX B   gać       żcie      ugać
SFX B   ać        że        jać
SFX B   ać        0         jać
SFX B   ać        myż       jać
SFX B   ać        my        jać
SFX B   ać        cież      jać
SFX B   ać        cie       jać
SFX B   ć         jże       [^z]dać
SFX B   ć         j         [^z]dać
SFX B   ć         jmyż      [^z]dać
SFX B   ć         jmy       [^z]dać
SFX B   ć         jcież     [^z]dać
SFX B   ć         jcie      [^z]dać
SFX B   ć         jże       yzdać
SFX B   ć         j         yzdać
SFX B   ć         jmyż      yzdać
SFX B   ć         jmy       yzdać
SFX B   ć         jcież     yzdać
SFX B   ć         jcie      yzdać
SFX B   zdać      żdżże     izdać
SFX B   zdać      żdż       izdać
SFX B   zdać      żdżmyż    izdać
SFX B   zdać      żdżmy     izdać
SFX B   zdać      żdżcież   izdać
SFX B   zdać      żdżcie    izdać
SFX B   ać        ejże      [il]ać
SFX B   ać        ej        [il]ać
SFX B   ać        ejmyż     [il]ać
SFX B   ać        ejmy      [il]ać
SFX B   ać        ejcież    [il]ać
SFX B   ać        ejcie     [il]ać
SFX B   kać       zczże     skać
SFX B   kać       zcz       skać
SFX B   kać       zczmyż    skać
SFX B   kać       zczmy     skać
SFX B   kać       zczcież   skać
SFX B   kać       zczcie    skać
SFX B   kać       czże      [^s]kać
SFX B   kać       cz        [^s]kać
SFX B   kać       czmyż     [^s]kać
SFX B   kać       czmy      [^s]kać
SFX B   kać       czcież    [^s]kać
SFX B   kać       czcie     [^s]kać
SFX B   słać      ścielże   słać
SFX B   słać      ściel     słać
SFX B   słać      ścielmyż  słać
SFX B   słać      ścielmy   słać
SFX B   słać      ścielcież słać
SFX B   słać      ścielcie  słać
SFX B   ać        że        mać
SFX B   ać        0         mać
SFX B   ać        myż       mać
SFX B   ać        my        mać
SFX B   ać        cież      mać
SFX B   ać        cie       mać
SFX B   tać       czże      [kłop]tać
SFX B   tać       cz        [kłop]tać
SFX B   tać       czmyż     [kłop]tać
SFX B   tać       czmy      [kłop]tać
SFX B   tać       czcież    [kłop]tać
SFX B   tać       czcie     [kłop]tać
SFX B   tać       czże      kołatać
SFX B   tać       cz        kołatać
SFX B   tać       czmyż     kołatać
SFX B   tać       czmy      kołatać
SFX B   tać       czcież    kołatać
SFX B   tać       czcie     kołatać
SFX B   tać       czże      [bł]echtać
SFX B   tać       cz        [bł]echtać
SFX B   tać       czmyż     [bł]echtać
SFX B   tać       czmy      [bł]echtać
SFX B   tać       czcież    [bł]echtać
SFX B   tać       czcie     [bł]echtać
SFX B   ać        że        [bp]ać
SFX B   ać        0         [bp]ać
SFX B   ać        myż       [bp]ać
SFX B   ać        my        [bp]ać
SFX B   ać        cież      [bp]ać
SFX B   ać        cie       [bp]ać
SFX B   ać        zże       [^s]sać
SFX B   ać        z         [^s]sać
SFX B   ać        zmyż      [^s]sać
SFX B   ać        zmy       [^s]sać
SFX B   ać        zcież     [^s]sać
SFX B   ać        zcie      [^s]sać
SFX B   ać        ijże      ssać
SFX B   ać        ij        ssać
SFX B   ać        ijmyż     ssać
SFX B   ać        ijmy      ssać
SFX B   ać        ijcież    ssać
SFX B   ać        ijcie     ssać
SFX B   tać       zczże     stać
SFX B   tać       zcz       stać
SFX B   tać       zczmyż    stać
SFX B   tać       zczmy     stać
SFX B   tać       zczcież   stać
SFX B   tać       zczcie    stać
SFX B   ać        zże       [^bp]rać
SFX B   ać        z         [^bp]rać
SFX B   ać        zmyż      [^bp]rać
SFX B   ać        zmy       [^bp]rać
SFX B   ać        zcież     [^bp]rać
SFX B   ać        zcie      [^bp]rać
SFX B   rać       ierzże    [bp]rać
SFX B   rać       ierz      [bp]rać
SFX B   rać       ierzmyż   [bp]rać
SFX B   rać       ierzmy    [bp]rać
SFX B   rać       ierzcież  [bp]rać
SFX B   rać       ierzcie   [bp]rać
SFX B   ć         jże       [ae]wać
SFX B   ć         j         [ae]wać
SFX B   ć         jmyż      [ae]wać
SFX B   ć         jmy       [ae]wać
SFX B   ć         jcież     [ae]wać
SFX B   ć         jcie      [ae]wać
SFX B   ać        ujże      [^ghk]iwać
SFX B   ać        uj        [^ghk]iwać
SFX B   ać        ujmyż     [^ghk]iwać
SFX B   ać        ujmy      [^ghk]iwać
SFX B   ać        ujcież    [^ghk]iwać
SFX B   ać        ujcie     [^ghk]iwać
SFX B   iwać      ujże      [ghk]iwać
SFX B   iwać      uj        [ghk]iwać
SFX B   iwać      ujmyż     [ghk]iwać
SFX B   iwać      ujmy      [ghk]iwać
SFX B   iwać      ujcież    [ghk]iwać
SFX B   iwać      ujcie     [ghk]iwać
SFX B   ować      ujże      ować
SFX B   ować      uj        ować
SFX B   ować      ujmyż     ować
SFX B   ować      ujmy      ować
SFX B   ować      ujcież    ować
SFX B   ować      ujcie     ować
SFX B   ać        ijże      [rz]wać
SFX B   ać        ij        [rz]wać
SFX B   ać        ijmyż     [rz]wać
SFX B   ać        ijmy      [rz]wać
SFX B   ać        ijcież    [rz]wać
SFX B   ać        ijcie     [rz]wać
SFX B   ywać      ujże      ywać
SFX B   ywać      uj        ywać
SFX B   ywać      ujmyż     ywać
SFX B   ywać      ujmy      ywać
SFX B   ywać      ujcież    ywać
SFX B   ywać      ujcie     ywać
SFX B   zać       żże       [^cdr]zać
SFX B   zać       ż         [^cdr]zać
