cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
alegować/BEGHJej
apercypować/BEGHJej
babieć/BHIdiv
bestwić/BHIdikv
blogować/BGHJej
brutalizować/BEGHJej
celkować/BEGHJdi
chmurnieć/BHIejv
cochnąć/BEFIej
czworakować/BEGHJej
deformować/BEGHJej
dementować/BEGHJej
desantować/BEGHJej
digitalizować/BEGHJej
dogazować/BEHJej
dokumentalizować/BEGHJdi
dopiąć/BEHIej
dosługiwać/BGHJej
dowartościować/BEHJej
dubbingować/BEGHJej
dziać/BEGHJej
eksterminować/BEGHJej
etablować/BEGHJdi
fechtować/BGHJej
folgować/BGHJej
funkcjonować/BGHJej
glansować/BEGHJej
grodzić/BEHIdikv
hangarować/BEGHJej
humusować/BEGHJej
infuzować/BEGHJej
irygować/BEGHJej
kalkulować/BEGHJej
kasetonować/BEGHJej
klasycyzować/BEGHJej
koleżankować/BGHJdi
konkatenować/BEGHJej
kopnąć/BEFIej
kropelkować/BEGHJej
kurtyzować/BEGHJej
legnąć/BHIej
lokautować/BEGHJej
magnetyzować/BEGHJej
mazać/BEGHJej
mieszczanieć/BHIdiv
monetaryzować/BEGHJej
nabiegnąć/BHIej
nadenerwować/BEHJej
nadskubywać/BEGHJej
nagumować/BEHJej
naładować/BEHJej
napodróżować/BHJej
naskamleć/BHdhi
natęsknić/BHIdi
neurastenizować/BEGHJej
obcować/BGHJej
obkopywać/BEGHJej
obrać/BEHJej
obszamerowywać/BEGHJej
ochlać/BHIJdik
odbetonowywać/BEGHJej
oddoraźnić/BEHIdi
odgrzechotać/BEHIJdik
odkochiwać/BEGHJej
odmetaforyzowywać/BEGHJej
odpicować/BEHJej
odpysknąć/BFIej
odsolidaryzowywać/BEGHJej
odtarasowywać/BEGHJej
odżąć/BEHIej
oklaskać/BEHIdhik
ometkowywać/BEGHJej
oplotkować/BEHJej
orosieć/BHIdi
ostygnąć/BFHIej
otrębywać/BEGHJej
paginować/BEGHJej
pasynkować/BEGHJej
piąstkować/BEGHJej
plantować/BEGHJej
pobełtać/BEHIdik
pochłodnieć/BHIej
podbrukować/BEHJej
podgłośnić/BEHIdi
podłamywać/BEGHJej
podrapać/BEHIej
podstrzyc/BEHIej
podziałkować/BHJej
pogłówkować/BHJej
pojeść/BEHIdi
pokonkurować/BHJej
poleźć/BHJej
pomejlować/BEHJej
poobciosywać/BEHJej
popaść/BHIdiEFejk
poprzestrzeliwać/BEHIdhik
porozumieć/BHdhik
posłać/BEHJdiIk
poszarzeć/BHIej
potańcować/BEHJej
powegetować/BHJej
powylatywać/BHJej
pozamieszkiwać/BEHJej
pożeglować/BHJej
profetyzować/BEGHJej
przebalansować/BEHJej
przecisnąć/BEFJej
przedziesiątkować/BEHJej
przegwizdywać/BEGHJej
przekłamać/BEHJej
przeląc/BHIej
przemłynkować/BEHJej
przepłynąć/BEFIej
przescrollować/BEHJej
przeszklić/BEHIdi
przetransponować/BEHJej
przeżąć/BEHIej
przydreptać/BHJej
przykopać/BEHIej
przypasywać/BEGHJej
przyssać/BEHJej
przywiać/BEHJej
raczkować/BGHJej
refabrykować/BEGHJej
remonstrować/BEGHJej
rewokować/BEGHJej
rozbuchiwać/BEGHJej
rozdrapywać/BEGHJej
rozgrodzić/BEHIdik
rozkołysać/BEHJej
rozminować/BEHJej
rozpłomienieć/BHIej
rozsiepywać/BEGHJej
roztasować/BEHJej
równouprawnić/BEHIdi
salwować/BEGHJej
schlać/BEHIJdik
sentymentalizować/BEGHJej
sfriendzonować/BEHJej
skapywać/BGHJej
skolimować/BEHJej
skopiować/BEHJej
skumulować/BEHJej
somatyzować/BEGHJej
spetryfikować/BEHJej
spojlować/BEGHJej
sprekaryzować/BEHJej
stacjonować/BGHJej
stoperować/BEGHJej
stygmatyzować/BEGHJej
szabatować/BGHJej
szlichtować/BEGHJej
szwindlować/BEGHJej
tagować/BEGHJej
termizować/BEGHJej
transportować/BEGHJej
tuszować/BEGHJej
uchlać/BHIJdik
udzierzgiwać/BEGHJej
ujeździć/BEHIdik
ulgnąć/BFIej
unifikować/BEGHJej
uporządkowywać/BEGHJej
urzeczownikowić/BEHIdik
usymbolizować/BEHJej
uturystycznić/BEHIdi
uzwyczajnić/BEHIdi
wcementować/BEHJej
wetować/BEGHJej
wiwatować/BGHJej
wmotywać/BEGHJej
wrąbać/BEHJej
współzobowiązać/BEHJej
wyabstrahować/BEHJej
wybździć/BEHIdi
wycyrklować/BEHJej
wydrelować/BEHJej
wyfluorkować/BEHJej
wyhodować/BEHJej
wykitować/BEHJej
wykształtować/BEHJei
wyłatywać/BEGHJej
wymonologować/BEHJdi
wyparować/BEHJej
wypłytkować/BEHJej
wypuentować/BEHJej
wyrzezywać/BEGHJej
wyspacjować/BEHJej
wyszczypywać/BEGHJej
wytaskiwać/BEGHJej
wywianować/BEHJej
wzornikować/BEGHJei
zabazgrać/BEHIJejk
zachichotać/BHJej
zaczipować/BEHJej
zadzierzgnąć/BEFIej
zagłaskać/BEHIdhik
zaimportować/BEHJej
zakasować/BEHJej
zakopać/BEHIej
zalegnąć/BHIej
zamglić/BHIdi
zaoctować/BEHJej
zaplątywać/BEGHJej
zaryć/BEHJej
zaszprycować/BEHJej
zawładywać/BEGHJej
zdefiniować/BEHJej
zdiafragmować/BEHJej
zesmrodzić/BHIdik
zgruzować/BEHJej
zlicować/BEHJej
zmizerować/BEHJej
zrecenzować/BEHJej
zrzednieć/BHIej
zwolnieć/BHIej
